Utah statutes.
59-1-206.   Appointment of staff -- Executive director -- Compensation --
Administrative secretary -- Internal audit unit -- Appeals office staff --
Division directors -- Criminal tax investigators.
(1)  The commission shall appoint the following persons who are qualified,
knowledgeable, and experienced in matters relating to their respective
positions, exempt under Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management
Act, to serve at the pleasure of, and who are directly accountable to, the
commission:
(a)  in consultation with the governor and with the consent of the Senate, an
executive director;
(b)  an administrative secretary;
(c)  an internal audit unit; and
(d)  an appeals staff.
(2)  The governor shall establish the executive director's salary within the
salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer
Compensation.
(3)  Division directors shall be appointed by the executive director subject
to the approval of the commission.  The division directors are exempt
employees under Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.
(4) (a)  The executive director may with the approval of the commission employ
additional staff necessary to perform the duties and responsibilities of the
commission.  These employees are subject to Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State
Personnel Management Act.
(b) (i)  The executive director may under Subsection (4)(a) employ criminal
tax investigators to help the commission carry out its duties and
responsibilities regarding criminal provisions of the state tax laws.  The
executive director may not employ more than eight criminal tax investigators
at one time.
(ii)  The executive director may designate investigators hired under this
Subsection (4)(b) as special function officers, as defined in Section
53-13-105, to enforce the criminal provisions of the state tax laws.
(iii)  Notwithstanding Section 49-15-201, any special function officer
designated under this Subsection (4)(b) may not become or be designated as a
member of the Public Safety Retirement Systems.
(5)  The internal audit unit shall provide the following:
(a)  an examination to determine the honesty and integrity of fiscal affairs,
the accuracy and reliability of financial statements and reports, and the
adequacy and effectiveness of financial controls to properly record and
safeguard the acquisition, custody, and use of public funds;
(b)  an examination to determine whether commission administrators have
faithfully adhered to commission policies and legislative intent;
(c)  an examination to determine whether the operations of the divisions and
other units of the commission have been conducted in an efficient and
effective manner;
(d)  an examination to determine whether the programs administered by the
divisions and other units of the commission have been effective in
accomplishing intended objectives; and
(e)  an examination to determine whether management control and information
systems are adequate and effective in assuring that commission programs are
administered faithfully, efficiently, and effectively.
(6)  The appeals office shall receive and hear appeals to the commission and
shall conduct the hearings in compliance with formal written rules approved by
the commission.  The commission has final review authority over the appeals.
